Georgia, session 2025_26, HB865.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elections and
primaries generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"21-2-79.
In the event that the office of a local election superintendent is closed as a result of a
declared state of emergency, such superintendent shall as soon as possible post notice of
such closure on the website maintained by the county, or municipality in the event of the
closure of a municipal superintendent's office, and by posting visible signage on the door
giving notice of the closure to the public and providing details relevant to the closure,
including, but not limited to, when the office will be reopened and how to contact the office
staff during the closure, if applicable."
H. B. 865
- 1 -

LC 47 3682
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 865
- 2 -